Virginia statutes. Title 8.2. Commercial Code — Sales.
Official Comments in Article 8.2:

Copyright by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.
Reprinted with permission of the Permanent Editorial Board of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The Revision of Uniform Commercial Commentary Article 1 — General Provisions, drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws of The American Law Institute, and approved by the American Bar Association on February 12, 2002, made conforming amendments to other articles of the UCC and the commentary thereto.